Massachusetts, session 194th, S146.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 51B of Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the 
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (a) the following 
paragraphs:- 
(1) The department shall create and utilize a comprehensive maltreatment coding 
system that provides a standardized method for categorizing instances of abuse and neglect by 
severity for families during the initial investigation phase.   
(2) Categories should include, but are not limited to: (i) parental abuse; (ii) imminent 
risk of serious harm (iii) labor trafficking; (iv) emotional abuse; (v) neglect; (vi) physical abuse; 
(vii) sexual abuse; (viii) exploitation 
(3) The coding system should further include coding based on abuse related to sexual 
orientation, gender identity, and expression in an effort to provide family preservation and 

of 2 12 acceptance education; as well as racial discrimination for youth who are not in the care of their 
family of origin.  
(4) The coding system should be applied upon opening a case and used in 
conjunction with existing software to assist in the assessment and continued evaluation of 
ongoing cases.  
(5) The department shall review the categories of the system at least every two years 
and update as needed.